Washington statutes.
RCW 16.50.140

Manually operated hammer, sledge or poleaxe—Declared inhumane.

The use of a manually operated hammer, sledge or poleaxe is declared to be an inhumane method of slaughter within the meaning of this chapter.

[ 1967 c 31 s 5.]